src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IICONJw-PL  !!= @CODE@  w final, only Pl forms Adds a baseform = Prs+3Pl and more diacr.flags. Be aware that two of the flags are identical, and couse overgeneration for hfst. See bz. 1859.
!< "+V":w "+II":0  "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@" "@U.perspref.NULL@" > # ; !baseform
< "+V":0 "+II":0  "@U.perspref.NULL@" > IICONJ-CONTw-PL ;


LEXICON IICONJ-CONTw !!= @CODE@ w final. Splits according to mood
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  II_INDw ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > II_CNJw ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERSw-SG ;!
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERSw-PL ;!

LEXICON IICONJ-CONTw-SG !!= @CODE@ w final. Splits according to mood
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  II_INDw-SG ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > II_CNJw-SG ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERSw-SG ;!

LEXICON IICONJ-CONTw-PL !!= @CODE@ w final. Splits according to mood
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  II_INDw-PL ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > II_CNJw-PL ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERSw-PL ;!

LEXICON IICONJ-CONT !!= @CODE@ splits according to mood
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  II_IND ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > II_CNJ ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERS-SG ;!
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERS-PL ;!

LEXICON IICONJ-CONT-SG !!= @CODE@ splits according to mood
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  II_IND-SG ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > II_CNJ-SG ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERS-SG ;!

LEXICON IICONJ-CONT-PL !!= @CODE@ splits according to mood
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  II_IND-PL ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > II_CNJ-PL ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > II_IND_PERS-PL ;!

LEXICON II_INDw !!= @CODE@ indicative for w final
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-PL ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-PL ; !
!< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS ; !
!< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS ; !


LEXICON II_INDw-SG !!= @CODE@ indicative for w final
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS-SG ; ! pros aspect

LEXICON II_INDw-PL !!= @CODE@ indicative for w final
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-PL ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERSw-PL ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS-PL ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS-PL ; ! pros aspect

LEXICON II_CNJw !!= @CODE@ conjunctive for w final
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-SG ; !
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-PL ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-SG ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-PL ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERSw-SG ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERSw-PL ; !

LEXICON II_CNJw-SG !!= @CODE@ conjunctive for w final
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-SG ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-SG ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERSw-SG ; !

LEXICON II_CNJw-PL !!= @CODE@ conjunctive for w final
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-PL ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERSw-PL ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERSw-PL ; !


LEXICON II_IND !!= @CODE@ indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERS-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERS-PL ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERS-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERS-PL ; !
!< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS-SG ; 
!< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS-PL ; 
!< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS-SG ; 
!< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS-PL ; 

LEXICON II_IND-SG !!= @CODE@ indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERS-SG ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERS-SG ; !
!< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS-SG ; 
!< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS-SG ; 

LEXICON II_IND-PL !!= @CODE@ indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > II_IND_PERS-PL ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > II_IND_PERS-PL ; !
!< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > II_IND_PERS-PL ; 
!< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > II_IND_PERS-PL ; 


LEXICON II_CNJ !!= @CODE@ conjunctive
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-SG ; !
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-PL ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-SG ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-PL ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERS-SG ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERS-PL ; !

LEXICON II_CNJ-SG !!= @CODE@ conjunctive
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-SG ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-SG ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERS-SG ; !

LEXICON II_CNJ-PL !!= @CODE@ conjunctive
< "+Prs":0          "@U.tense.Prs@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-PL ; !
< "+Prt":0          "@U.tense.Prt@"    > II_CNJ_PERS-PL ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 "@U.tense.FutInt@" > II_CNJ_PERS-PL ; !

 
LEXICON II_IND_PERSw-SG   !!= @CODE@ w final 
+3Sg:%>w # ;
+4Sg:%>yiw # ;

LEXICON II_IND_PERSw-PL   !!= @CODE@ w final 
+3Pl:%>wa # ;
+4Pl:%>yiwa # ;

LEXICON II_IND_PERS-SG   !!= @CODE@ -n final 
+3Sg: # ;
+4Sg:%>iyiw # ;

LEXICON II_IND_PERS-PL   !!= @CODE@ -n final 
+3Pl:%>wa # ;
+4Pl:%>iyiwa # ;

LEXICON II_CNJ_PERSw-SG   !!= @CODE@ w final 
+3Sg:%>%^NIIk # ;
+4Sg:%>yik # ;

LEXICON II_CNJ_PERSw-PL   !!= @CODE@ w final 
+3Pl:%>%^NIIki # ;
+4Pl:%>yiki # ;

LEXICON II_CNJ_PERS-SG   !!= @CODE@ -n final 
+3Sg:%>%^NIIk # ;
+4Sg:%>iyik # ;

LEXICON II_CNJ_PERS-PL   !!= @CODE@ -n final 
+3Pl:%>%^NIIki # ;
+4Pl:%>iyiki # ;




! LEXICON II_IND_PERSv-SG   !@CODE@ v final 
! +3Sg:%>w # ;
! +4Sg:%>yiw # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_IND_PERSv-PL   !@CODE@ v final 
! +3Pl:%>wa # ;
! +4Pl:%>yiwa # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_CNJ_PERSv-SG   !@CODE@ v final 
! +3Sg:%>%^NIIk # ;
! +4Sg:%>yik # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_CNJ_PERSv-PL   !@CODE@ v final 
! +3Pl:%>%^NIIki # ;
! +4Pl:%>yiki # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_IND_PERSan-SG   !@CODE@ -an final 
! +3Sg: # ;
! +4Sg:%>iyiw # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_IND_PERSan-PL   !@CODE@ -an final 
! +3Pl:%>wa # ;
! +4Pl:%>iyiwa # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_CNJ_PERSan-SG   !@CODE@ -an final 
! +3Sg:%>%^NIIk # ;
! +4Sg:%>iyik # ;
! 
! LEXICON II_CNJ_PERSan-PL   !@CODE@ -an final 
! +3Pl:%>%^NIIki # ;
! +4Pl:%>iyiki # ;




!LEXICON II_IND_PERS 
!    :%>k # ;  Both these entries now give wrong forms (ê-misponk pro ê-mispok etc.)
!+Fut:%>i # ;  We need to decide whether to solve it in lexc (more lexica) or
!              in twolc (more abstract representation)


!! !!!Transitive animate (TA)
!     =======================
!     =======================

!! The VTA verbs split in different moods.
!! There are 5 stem classes in Wolv, 1-5 (VTA-1 through VTA-5)

! Main verb stems

LEXICON TACONJ_1 !!= @CODE@ 
!< "+V":0 "+TA":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TA: TACONJ-CONT ;

LEXICON TACONJ_2  !!= * @CODE@ Vw + i suf deletes w and i.
!< "+V":0 "+TA":0 0:ê 0:w "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TA: TACONJ-CONTVw ;

LEXICON TACONJ_3  !!= * @CODE@ Cw where w + i become o
!< "+V":0 "+TA":0 0:ê 0:w "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TA: TACONJ-CONTCw ;
