src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBSTEMS !!= @CODE@ here come all the verbstems \\
pîwastêw:pîwastê IICONJw-PL "it is scattered about" ; ! VII-v Independent, 0s often plural
astamawêw:astamaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he puts (it/him) on s.o.; s/he applies (it/him) to s.o.; s/he places (it/him) for s.o., s/he bets with s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
ayâkonêhwêw:ayâkonêhw TACONJ_3 "s/he covers s.o. with snow" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
âhciwinêw:âhciwin TACONJ_1 "s/he lowers s.o.'s wages or earnings" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
âstawêskawêw:âstawêskaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he extinguishes s.o. by foot" ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
cahkâpahwêw:cahkâpahw TACONJ_3 "s/he jabs s.o. in the eye with something" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
iskosihêw:iskosih TACONJ_1 "s/he makes s.o. so long" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
îkatê-tihtipinamawêw:îkatê-tihtipinamaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he rolls (it/him) aside for s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kakwâtakâpaswêw:kakwâtakâpasw TACONJ_3 "s/he torments s.o. with smoke" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kapâ-wêpinêw:kapâ-wêpin TACONJ_1 "s/he tosses s.o. ashore" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kâsîyâpahwêw:kâsîyâpahw TACONJ_3 "s/he wipes s.o.'s eyes" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kikiskawêw:kikiskaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he wears s.o. (e.g. stocking, ring); s/he is with child" ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kisiwi-kanawâpamêw:kisiwi-kanawâpam TACONJ_1 "s/he frowns at s.o." ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kînikatahamawêw:kînikatahamaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he makes pickets for s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kîskwê-wêpahwêw:kîskwê-wêpahw TACONJ_3 "s/he knocks s.o. silly" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kîspôhêw:kîspôh TACONJ_1 "s/he makes s.o. full, s/he feeds s.o. until full, s/he gets s.o. (e.g. horse) fully fed, s/he gives s.o. enough to eat" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
mamihcimêw:mamihcim TACONJ_1 "s/he praises s.o., s/he boasts about s.o." ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
manisamawêw:manisamaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he cuts (it/him) from or for s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
mêstâpâwahwêw:mêstâpâwahw TACONJ_3 "s/he wears s.o. away by repeated action" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
misi-pônamawêw:misi-pônamaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he makes a large fire for s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nahiskawêw:nahiskaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he has s.o. fit well, s/he fits s.o. well; s/he looks nice in s.o. (e.g. pants); s/he looks nicely dressed; s/he wears s.o. becomingly (e.g. pants); s/he looks good with s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nakacipahêw:nakacipah TACONJ_1 "s/he runs away from s.o.; s/he leaves s.o. alone, behind by running; s/he outdistances s.o." ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nitotamâkêstawêw:nitotamâkêstaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he makes demands for (it/him) for s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
ohpâskwahwêw:ohpâskwahw TACONJ_3 "s/he raises s.o. (with a bar or pole)" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
ohtinêw:ohtin TACONJ_1 "s/he gets s.o. from there, s/he takes s.o. from there, s/he obtains s.o. from there" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
paskêtisahwêw:paskêtisahw TACONJ_3 "s/he drives s.o. off from the herd" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pâstiskawêw:pâstiskaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he breaks s.o. by foot" ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pêtisahwêw:pêtisahw TACONJ_3 "s/he drives or sends s.o. hither" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pêyakohêw:pêyakoh TACONJ_1 "s/he deals only with s.o., s/he deals with s.o. alone" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pôskwatahwêw:pôskwatahw TACONJ_3 "s/he puts holes in s.o. (by tool)" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
sâpo-kiskinohtahêw:sâpo-kiskinohtah TACONJ_1 "s/he guides s.o. all the way through" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
sîhtahamawêw:sîhtahamaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he tightens (it/him) for s.o." ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
sôhkâskwahwêw:sôhkâskwahw TACONJ_3 "s/he props s.o. up to reinforce" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
tôhkâpinêw:tôhkâpin TACONJ_1 "s/he opens s.o.'s eyes by hand" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
wayawî-wêpiskawêw:wayawî-wêpiskaw2 TACONJ_2 "s/he kick s.o. out" ; ! VTA-2 Independent, 3s-3’ 
wâsêhkwahwêw:wâsêhkwahw TACONJ_3 "s/he polishes s.o. bright" ; ! VTA-3 Independent, 3s-3’ 
wîwahêw:wîwah TACONJ_1 "s/he puts a load on s.o. (e.g. horse)" ; ! VTA-1 Independent, 3s-3’ 
